Vermont, session 2025-2026, H692.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Civics Strengthens Democracy Act.”
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Neglect for civics in our secondary education system has contributed
to a citizenry and electorate who are poorly prepared to understand, appreciate,
and use our form of government and civic life.
VT LEG #385754 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.692
2026 Page 2 of 4
(2) All students need to have the civic knowledge, skills, dispositions,
and behaviors necessary to participate in, preserve, and strengthen our
republic.
(3) Vermont should embrace civics education that:
(A) inspires students to want to become involved in their
constitutional democracy and help to sustain our republic;
(B) celebrates the compromises needed to make our constitutional
democracy work;
(C) cultivates civic honesty;
(D) is relevant and engaging for students and teaches civics in an
integrated and inquiry-based manner; and
(E) teaches civics through a timeline of historical events.
(4) Students who experience comprehensive, high-quality civics
education are more likely to vote and discuss politics at home, complete
college and develop employable skills, volunteer, and work on community
issues, and are more confident in their ability to speak publicly and
communicate with their elected representatives.
(5) The civic strength of our country relies on prioritizing and investing
in quality, comprehensive civic learning for the next generation of civic
participants.
VT LEG #385754 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.692
2026 Page 3 of 4
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 914 is added to read:
§ 914. CIVICS EDUCATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Education.
(2) “Civics” means a nonpartisan educational program that addresses:
(A) civic knowledge, which includes the acquisition of knowledge,
including an understanding of the history, heritage, civic life, and civic
institutions of the United States;
(B) civic skills, which includes the acquisition of skills, such as the
ability to analyze text and determine the reliability of sources, as well as an
understanding of the ways in which civic institutions operate and how
individuals may be involved in civic life;
(C) civic dispositions, which includes the acquisition of dispositions
and values such as appreciation for free speech, civil discourse, tolerance, and
inclusion, and an understanding of perspectives that differ from one’s own, as
well as a disposition to be civically engaged; and
(D) civic behavior, which includes the development of behaviors,
including civic habits and practices such as voting, serving on juries,
engagement in deliberative discussions, volunteering, attending public
meetings, and other activities related to civic life.
VT LEG #385754 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.692
2026 Page 4 of 4
(b) In all public schools, civics shall be taught in either grade 11 or grade
12 as a required subject to promote civic service and a greater knowledge
thereof, and to prepare students, morally and intellectually, for the duties of
citizenship. The Agency shall require universal, equitable access to high-
quality civics learning experiences, including dedicated class time for civics, at
a minimum of one quarter-semester in duration.
Sec. 4. IMPLEMENTATION
School districts shall be required to comply with 16 V.S.A. § 914 beginning
in the 2027–2028 school year.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385754 v.3